Tennessee, session 114, SB2180.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 54, Chapter 1, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Metropolitan planning organization" or "MPO" has the same meaning
as defined in § 64-8-302;
(2) "Nonmetropolitan area" has the same meaning as defined in 23
U.S.C. § 134;
(3) "Rural planning organization" or "RPO" means an organization
established as the result of a designation under 23 U.S.C. § 135(m); and
(4) "Urbanized area" has the same meaning as defined in 23 U.S.C. §
134.
(b) The department's allocation of federal and state funds to rural planning
organizations (RPOs) for transportation planning and implementation in nonmetropolitan
areas of this state must remain in parity with the department's allocation of federal and
state funds to metropolitan planning organizations (MPOs) for transportation planning
and implementation in urbanized areas of this state.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to federal or state funds applied for on or after July 1, 2026, and if no application
occurred before July 1, 2026, applies to federal or state funds accepted on or after July 1, 2027.
SB2180
009645
- 1 -